Idaho, session 2026, H0970.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6607. REPORTS OF CONTRIBUTIONS AND EXPENDITURES BY CANDIDATES AND
POLITICAL COMMITTEES. (1) Each candidate or the political treasurer for each
candidate, and each political committee or the political treasurer of each
political committee, shall file with the secretary of state a statement of
all contributions received and all expenditures and encumbrances made by or
on behalf of the candidate or political committee, according to the schedule
provided in this section. The statement shall itemize each contribution re-
ceived and each expenditure or encumbrance made during the reporting period
and shall include the following:
(a) Under contributions, the statement shall include a list of all the
contributions received, including any funds or property of the candi-
date used to cover expenditures. The statement shall list the full name
and complete address of each person who contributed an aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the amount contributed by that
person. The statement may list as a single item the total amount of con-
tributions of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less; and
(b) Under expenditures, the statement shall include the name and ad-
dress of each person to whom an expenditure or encumbrance was made in
the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more, and the amount,
date, and purpose of each such expenditure. Each expenditure or encum-
brance in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more shall be
evidenced by an invoice, receipt, or canceled check or an accurate copy
thereof. Such evidence shall not be filed with the statement but shall
be retained by the committee or candidate for a period of one (1) year
after the statement has been filed. The statement may list as a single
item the total amount of expenditures and encumbrances of less than
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) without showing the exact amount of or re-
quiring evidence of each such expenditure or encumbrance. Anything of


value, other than money, paid for or contributed by any person shall be
listed both as an expenditure and as a contribution.
(2) For the first report under this section, the reporting period shall
cover the period beginning with the first contribution, expenditure, or en-
cumbrance through the end of the current reporting period. Each candidate
and each political committee, or the treasurer for a candidate or political
committee or ballot measure, shall file the report described under subsec-
tion (1) of this section as follows:
(a) In the year of the election, a monthly report shall be filed for each
month of the year. Each report shall be filed by the tenth day of the
month following the month being reported; and
(b) For the nonelection year, an annual report covering the nonelection
year shall be filed by January 10 of the following year.
(3) Notwithstanding any other reports required under this section,
each candidate and each political committee, or the political treasurer for
each candidate and each political committee, shall notify the secretary of
state of any contribution of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. This
notification shall be made within forty-eight (48) hours after the receipt
of such contribution and shall include the name of the candidate, political
committee or measure, the identification of the contributor, and the date of
receipt and amount of the contribution. The notification shall be in addi-
tion to the reporting of these contributions in the regular reports.
(4) All reports required pursuant to this section shall be filed online
with the secretary of state, unless a waiver has been provided under section
67-6623, Idaho Code, by no later than midnight on the date the filing is due.
(5)(a) In the case of any political committee organized for the purpose
of supporting any measure, the following additional information shall
be included in its reports filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion:
(i) A certification from the political treasurer of the political
committee that no preliminary activity was funded by any foreign
national, whether directly or indirectly; and
(ii) A certification from the political treasurer of the politi-
cal committee that the donor associated with each contribution is
not a foreign national and such donor has not knowingly or will-
fully received, solicited, or accepted, whether directly or indi-
rectly, contributions or expenditures from one (1) or more foreign
nationals in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) within the
four (4) year period immediately preceding the date of the contri-
bution.
(b) Upon receipt of a contribution, the political treasurer of the
political committee shall obtain a written certification from each
donor that the donor is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or
willfully accepted funds aggregating in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) from one (1) or more foreign nationals within the four (4)
year period immediately preceding the date of the contribution. The
donor certifications shall be retained by the committee but are not
required to be filed with the political treasurer certifications re-
quired by paragraph (a) of this subsection. If the committee does not
receive this certification from each donor, the contribution shall be


divested in the same manner as unlawful contributions pursuant to sec-
tion 67-6610(b), Idaho Code.
(6) Each person, or political treasurer of any entity, who makes any ex-
penditure supporting or opposing any measure shall certify that such person
has not knowingly or willfully accepted funds aggregating in excess of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) from one (1) or more foreign nationals within the
four (4) year period immediately preceding the date the expenditure is made
and that such person will not do so through the remainder of the calendar year
in which the ballot initiative or referendum will appear on the ballot.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Foreign national" has the same meaning as defined in section
67-6610D, Idaho Code.
(b) "Preliminary activity" means any activity undertaken by the propo-
nents of a proposed measure prior to the time such proposal is deemed a
measure pursuant to the provisions of section 67-6602(11), Idaho Code.
Such activity includes but is not limited to conducting a poll, draft-
ing ballot measure language, conducting a focus group, making telephone
calls, or undertaking travel related to the proposed measure.
(5) (8) Reports required to be filed under the provisions of this sec-
tion shall be filed until the account no longer shows any unexpended balance
of contributions or expenditure deficit.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6610D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6610D. FOREIGN CONTRIBUTIONS, FOREIGN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURES,
AND FOREIGN ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS, AND FOREIGN INFLUENCE PROHIB-
ITED.
(1)(a) A Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a for-
eign national shall not make a contribution, directly or indirectly, to
any candidate, political committee, or measure or, make electioneer-
ing communications or, make independent expenditures, or direct, dic-
tate, control, or directly or indirectly participate in the decision-
making process related to any election campaign, including any deci-
sions concerning the making of contributions or expenditures to influ-
ence an election campaign. A foreign national shall not solicit, di-
rectly or indirectly, the making of a contribution or expenditure by an-
other person to influence an election campaign, and no candidate or po-
litical committee shall knowingly or willfully receive, solicit, or ac-
cept contributions from any foreign national, whether directly or indi-
rectly.
(b) A foreign national, pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of this section,
may make contributions and independent expenditures if such contri-
butions or expenditures originate entirely from funds generated by
such entity's United States operations and all decisions concerning
such contributions or expenditures, except for setting overall budget
amounts, are made by individuals who are United States citizens or per-
manent residents.
(2) As used in this section, "foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and is not
lawfully admitted for permanent residence;


(b) A government or subdivision of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party; or
(d) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, or-
ganization, union, or other combination of persons, that is organized
under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign
country.; or
(e) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, or-
ganization, union, or other combination of persons, that is organized
under the laws of the United States or has its principal place of busi-
ness in the United States that is wholly owned or majority-owned by any
foreign national.
(3) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be prosecuted
and punished as provided in section 67-6625(2) through (5), Idaho Code. Pro-
vided, however, any person who knowingly and willfully violates the provi-
sions of this section is guilty of a felony when:
(a) The aggregate amount of contributions, independent expenditures,
or cost of electioneering communications made in violation of this sec-
tion exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a consecutive twelve (12)
month period; or
(b) The person pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a knowing and will-
ful violation of the provisions of this section for a second time within
ten (10) years, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld
judgment.
(4) If any provision of this section or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the section or the applica-
tion of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 66, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6610E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6610E. RESTRICTIONS ON COLLECTION AND RELEASE OF DONOR INFORMATION
-- PENALTY. (1) Lawful donors to a tax-exempt organization possess a right
of privacy in their donations. Any investigation of an alleged violation of
section 67-6607 or 67-6610D, Idaho Code, must occur in a manner that shields
the identity of lawful donors as much as possible. The secretary of state,
county clerks, and other state or local governmental entities may not col-
lect or require the submission of information on the identity of any donor
to a tax-exempt organization other than those directly related to an alleged
violation of section 67-6607 or 67-6610D, Idaho Code.
(2) The secretary of state, county clerks, and other state or local gov-
ernmental entities may not disclose to the public, or to another government
official not directly involved in the investigation, information revealing
the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt organization, unless the informa-
tion is regarding the identity of a donor that engaged in conduct prohibited
by section 67-6607 or 67-6610D, Idaho Code, after a final determination has
been made confirming that such violation occurred.
(3) Knowing or willful violations of this section shall be punishable
as a misdemeanor.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.